District of Columbia statutes.
38-824.05

Mandatory reporting.

Beginning in 2011, on or before September 30 of each year, the Office of the State Superintendent of Education shall report to the Mayor, the Council, and the Healthy Schools and Youth Commission annually regarding:

(1)

Compliance of public schools and public charter schools with the physical and health education requirements in this subchapter; and

(2)

Student achievement with respect to health and physical education standards.

July 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-209, § 405, 57 DCR 4779